Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB808.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13A03 of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 13A03. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Affiliate." Any of the following:(1) An entity or person that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, another entity or person.(2) An officer, director or manager of an entity.1234567891011121314151617181920 (3) An entity or person directly or indirectly owning, controlling or holding with power to vote 10% or more of the outstanding voting securities of another entity or person.(4) An entity or person 10% or more of whose outstanding voting securities are directly or indirectly owned, controlled or held by another entity or person with power to vote such securities.(5) A member of the same household, as well as an immediate family member, of any person described in paragraph (1), (2), (3) or (4) of this definition.* * *"Control." As used in the definition of "affiliate," the term means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of an entity or person, whether through ownership of voting securities, by contract or otherwise.* * *"Political consultant." An entity or person providing political consulting services."Political consulting." The provision, for compensation, to any state or county public official, candidate or nominee, as those terms are defined under section 1102 (relating to definitions) for an elected State or county office of advice, services or assistance in securing such public office, including, but not limited to, campaign management, fundraising activities, voter outreach, public relations or media service, but shall exclude bona fide legal work directly related to litigation or legal advice with regard to securing a place on the ballot, the petitioning process, the conduct of an election or which involves election laws.20250SB0808PN0853 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. Section 13A04(a), (d)(1) and (e)(1), (2) and (4) of Title 65 are amended, subsection (b)(1) and (2) are amended by adding subparagraphs, subsection (c) is amended by adding a paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 13A04. Registration.(a) [General rule] Enrollment.--Unless excluded under section 13A06 (relating to exemption from registration and expense reporting), a lobbyist, lobbying firm [or a], principal or political consultant must register with the department electronically using the computerized filing system developed by the department that is consistent with the purposes of this chapter within ten days of acting in any capacity as a lobbyist, lobbying firm [or], principal or political consultant. Registration shall be biennial [and shall begin January 1, 2007].(b) Principals and lobbying firms.--(1) A principal or lobbying firm required to register under subsection (a) shall file a single registration statement setting forth the following information with the department:* * *(x) Name of any affiliates.(2) A lobbying firm shall include in its statement under paragraph (1) the following information for each principal it represents:* * *(v) Name of any affiliates.* * *20250SB0808PN0853 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Lobbyist.--A lobbyist who is required to register under subsection (a) shall file a single registration statement setting forth the following information with the department:* * *(10) Name of any affiliates.(c.1) Political consultants.--A political consultant who is required to register under subsection (a) shall file a single registration statement providing the following information to the department:(1) Name.(2) Permanent business address.(3) Daytime telephone number.(4) E-mail address, if available.(5) Name of the political candidate or candidates for whom the consultant will be providing services or assistance or for whom the political consultant has provided services or assistance in the past 12 months.(6) Each office for which a political candidate identified in paragraph (5) is seeking or sought election.(7) Name of any affiliates.(d) Amendments.--(1) If there is a change of information required for the registration statement under subsection (b)(1) or (2) [or], (c) or (c.1), an amended registration statement shall be filed with the department electronically using the computerized filing system developed by the department that is consistent with the purpose of this chapter within 14 days after the change occurs.* * *(e) Termination.--20250SB0808PN0853 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A lobbyist, lobbying firm [or], principal or political consultant may terminate registration by filing notice of termination with the department electronically using the computerized filing system developed by the department that is consistent with the purpose of this chapter.(2) After a review of the notice of termination, but no later than 15 days after receipt of the notice, the department shall issue to the lobbyist, lobbying firm [or], principal or political consultant a letter stating that the registrant has terminated registration. The filing of notice shall not affect the commission's authority to conduct investigations and hearings under section 13A08(g) (relating to administration).* * *(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to exempt a lobbyist, lobbying firm [or], principal or political consultant from any of the requirements in section 13A05 (relating to expense reporting).Section 3. Sections 13A05 heading, 13A06 heading and introductory paragraph, (1), (3), (4), (5), (11) and (12) of Title 65 are amended to read:§ 13A05. [Reporting] Expense reporting.* * *§ 13A06. Exemption from registration and expense reporting.The following persons and activities shall be exempt from registration under section 13A04 (relating to registration) and reporting under section 13A05 (relating to expense reporting):(1) An individual who limits lobbying or political consulting to preparing testimony and testifying before a 20250SB0808PN0853 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 committee of the General Assembly or participating in an administrative proceeding of an agency.* * *(3) An individual who does not receive economic consideration for lobbying or political consulting.(4) An individual whose economic consideration for lobbying or political consulting, from all principals and from all State or county public officials, candidates or nominees whom the individual represented, does not exceed $2,500 in the aggregate during any reporting period for a lobbyist or during any calendar year for a political consultant.(5) An individual who engages in lobbying or political consulting on behalf of the individual's employer if the lobbying or political consulting represents less than 20 hours during any reporting period.* * *(11) An individual representing a bona fide church or bona fide religious body of which the individual is a member where the lobbying or political consulting is solely for the purpose of protecting the constitutional right to the free exercise of religion.(12) An individual who is not a registered lobbyist or a registered political consultant and who serves on an advisory board, working group or task force at the request of an agency or the General Assembly.* * *Section 4. Section 13A07(c), (d)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) introductory paragraph and (ii), (7) and (8) and (f)(1)(i), (vi) and (x) of Title 65 are amended and subsection (f)(1) is amended 20250SB0808PN0853 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by adding subparagraphs to read:§ 13A07. Prohibited activities.* * *(c) Falsification.--A lobbyist, lobbying firm [or], principal or political consultant may not, for the purpose of influencing legislative action or administrative action, transmit, utter or publish to a State official or employee a communication, knowing that the communication or a signature on the communication is false, forged, counterfeit or fictitious.(d) Conflicts of interest.--(1) Except as permitted by paragraph (2), a registrant may not lobby or provide political consulting services on behalf of a principal or a State or county public official, candidate or nominee on any subject matter in which the principal's or State or county public official's, candidate's or nominee's interests are directly adverse to the interests of another principal or State or county public official, candidate or nominee that is either currently represented by the lobbyist or political consultant or was previously represented by the lobbyist or political consultant during the current session of the General Assembly or the lobbyist's own interests.(2) A lobbyist or political consultant may represent a principal or a State or county public official, candidate or nominee in circumstances described in paragraph (1) if:(i) the lobbyist or political consultant reasonably believes that the lobbyist or political consultant will be able to provide competent and diligent representation or services to each affected principal or State or county public official, candidate or nominee;20250SB0808PN0853 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) the lobbyist or political consultant provides written notice to each affected principal or State or county public official, candidate or nominee upon becoming aware of the conflict; and(iii) each affected principal or State or county public official, candidate or nominee provides informed consent waiving the conflict of interest.(3) If a lobbyist or political consultant represents a principal in violation of this section or if multiple representation properly accepted becomes improper under this section and the conflict is not waived, the lobbyist or political consultant shall promptly withdraw from one or more representations or cease providing lobbying and political consulting services to the extent necessary for remaining representation to not be in violation of this section.(4) If a lobbyist or political consultant is prohibited by this section from engaging in particular conduct, an [employer] affiliate of the lobbyist [or a partner or other person associated with the lobbyist] or political consultant may not engage in the particular conduct.(5) A principal [or lobbyist], lobbyist or political consultant required to report under section 13A05 (relating to expense reporting) shall include in the report a statement affirming that to the best of the [principal's or lobbyist's knowledge the principal or lobbyist] principal's, lobbyist's or political consultant's knowledge, the principal, lobbyist or political consultant has complied with this section.(6) Except as provided in paragraph (8), and subject to 13A09(f) (relating to penalties), the commission may receive complaints regarding violations of this subsection. If the 20250SB0808PN0853 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission determines a violation of this subsection has occurred, the commission, after investigation, notice and hearing:* * *(ii) may prohibit a lobbyist from lobbying or a political consultant from providing political consulting services for economic consideration for up to five years.(7) A lobbyist [and], principal and political consultant shall maintain the records relating to the conflict of interest set forth in paragraph (2) for a four-year period beginning on the date the conflict is discovered and, in the case of an investigation conducted under paragraph (6), provide copies of the records to the commission upon request.(8) Complaints regarding violations of this subsection involving a lobbyist [or], principal or political consultant who is an attorney at law shall be referred to the board to be investigated, considered and resolved in a manner consistent with the Rules of Professional Conduct.* * *(f) Unlawful acts.--(1) A lobbyist [or], principal or political consultant may not:(i) [Instigate] While engaged in lobbying on behalf of the principal, instigate the introduction of legislation for the purpose of obtaining employment to lobby or providing political consulting services in opposition to that legislation.* * *(vi) Commit a criminal offense arising from lobbying or political consulting.20250SB0808PN0853 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(x) Engage in conduct which brings the practice of lobbying, political consulting or the legislative or executive branches of State government into disrepute.(xi) Lobby a State or county official or an employee on the State or county official's staff after the lobbyist, principal or political consultant has provided political consulting services for the State or county official. This prohibition shall only apply for the term in which the State or county official was elected.(xii) Provide political consulting services while registered as a lobbyist or a principal.* * *Section 5. Section 13A08(a), (d)(1) and (2) introductory paragraph, (g), (h), (j) and (k) of Title 65 are amended and subsection (d)(2) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 13A08. Administration.(a) Advice and opinions.--The commission shall provide advice and opinions under section 1107 (relating to powers and duties of commission) to a lobbyist, a lobbying firm, a principal, a political consultant, the department, the board or a State official or employee, that seeks advice regarding compliance with this chapter. A person that acts in good faith based on the written advice or opinion of the commission shall not be held liable for a violation of this chapter if the material facts are as stated in the request.* * *(d) Annual reporting.--(1) The department shall prepare and publish on its publicly accessible Internet website an annual report on 20250SB0808PN0853 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lobbying and political consulting activities in this Commonwealth.(2) The department shall at least annually publish on its publicly accessible Internet website a list of all of the following:* * *(iv) Registered political consultants.* * *(g) Investigation and hearings.--The commission, through its executive director, may initiate an investigation and hold a hearing concerning an alleged violation of this chapter by a lobbyist [or], principal or political consultant in accordance with sections 1107 (relating to powers and duties of commission) and 1108 (relating to investigations by commission).(h) Directory.--By May 1 of each odd-numbered year, the department shall produce and distribute a directory of all registered lobbyists, including photographs, registered political consultants and registered lobbying firms. Copies of the directory shall be made available to the public at a price not to exceed the actual cost of production. All revenue received by the department from the sales of the directory shall be deposited into the fund.* * *(j) Inflation adjustment.--On a biennial basis [commencing in January 2009], the department shall review the threshold under section 13A06 (relating to exemption from registration and expense reporting) for registration under section 13A04 (relating to registration) and the threshold for reporting under section 13A05(d) (relating to expense reporting) and shall increase these amounts to rates deemed reasonable for assuring 20250SB0808PN0853 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriate disclosure. On a biennial basis [commencing in January 2009], the department shall review the filing fee established under section 13A10 (relating to registration fees; fund established; system; regulations) and may by regulation adjust this amount if the department determines that a higher fee is needed to cover the costs of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The department shall [publish], by June 1 of every odd-numbered year, submit adjusted amounts to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin [by June 1, 2009, and by June 1 every two years thereafter as necessary].(k) Notices.--Notices issued by the department or the commission to a principal or lobbying firm, or to a political consultant, in accordance with this chapter, shall be delivered to the authorized representative, employee or agent.Section 6. Section 13A09(a)(1.1), (2)(ii) introductory paragraph and (5), (b)(2) and (3), (c)(1) introductory paragraph, (2) and (3), (d), (f) and (g)(2) of Title 65 are amended and subsection (e) is amended by adding an introductory paragraph to read:§ 13A09. Penalties.(a) Notice of alleged noncompliance.--* * *(1.1) In the case of a principal [or], lobbying firm or political consultant, the notice shall be delivered to the authorized representative, employee or agent.(2) The notice shall state:* * *(ii) subject to subsection (f), the administrative and criminal penalties for:20250SB0808PN0853 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(5) If the person does not request a hearing in accordance with the notice, the alleged noncompliance shall be deemed to constitute noncompliance with this chapter, and subject to subsection (f), the commission shall impose a penalty in accordance with subsection (b)(3) or (4).(b) Hearing.--* * *(2) [If] Subject to subsection (f), if the commission finds that failure to register or report was intentional, it shall refer the matter to the Attorney General [and] or, if the person is an attorney at law, to the board.(3) [If] Subject to subsection (f), if the commission finds that failure to register or report was negligent, it shall determine the amount of the administrative penalty to be imposed.* * *(c) Negligent failure to register or report.--(1) [Negligent] Subject to subsection (f), negligent failure to register or report as required by this chapter is punishable by an administrative penalty not exceeding the following:* * *(2) After a hearing under subsection (b), the commission may, upon the majority vote of all of its members, but subject to subsection (f), levy an administrative penalty. The total amount of the administrative penalty levied shall not be limited by any other provision of law.(3) The commission shall notify the board of any lobbyist [or], principal or political consultant who is an 20250SB0808PN0853 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attorney at law [against whom a civil penalty is imposed] and who has been determined to be in noncompliance.* * *(d) Failure to comply after notice.--[A] Subject to subsection (f), a person that fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter, after notice of noncompliance and after a hearing if one is requested, may be prohibited from lobbying or from providing political consulting services for economic consideration for up to five years. The prohibition shall be imposed under subsection (e)(4).(e) Intentional violations.--Subject to subsection (f):* * *(f) Attorneys.--[Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the board's authority to discipline an attorney at law who is acting as a lobbyist or principal.] Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, a lobbyist subject to the Rules of Professional Conduct promulgated by the Supreme Court shall only be disciplined for a violation of this chapter as permitted by such rules and nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the board's authority to discipline an attorney at law who is acting as a lobbyist, political consultant or principal.(g) Affirmative defense.--Any of the following is an affirmative defense to an action brought under Chapter 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure) or this chapter:* * *(2) The respondent or defendant relied on notice under section 13A05(b)(3)(iv) (relating to expense reporting).20250SB0808PN0853 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 7. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 8. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment or addition of 65 Pa.C.S. § 13A07(f)(1)(x), (xi) and (xii) shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.(2) This section and section 8 of this act shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0808PN0853 - 15 - 1234567891011121314